Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4691.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 97A.133, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 3a. new text end new text begin Motorized waterfowl boats within wildlife management areas. new text end new text begin A person may use a motorized waterfowl boat during the waterfowl-hunting season in a wildlife management area if the person is: new text end new text begin (1) age 65 and over; new text end new text begin (2) in compliance with section 97B.805; and new text end new text begin (3) in a wildlife management area located south of U.S. Highway 10 beginning at the west boundary of the state, thence along U.S. Highway 10 to the east boundary of the state. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin MOTORIZED WATERFOWL BOAT USE IN FEDERAL WATERFOWL PRODUCTION AREAS.new text end new text begin The commissioner of natural resources must notify the United States Fish and Wildlife Service of the ability to use a motorized waterfowl boat in a wildlife management area under Minnesota Statutes, section 97A.133, subdivision 3a, and request that federal regulations for waterfowl production areas be modified to allow for similar use of motorized waterfowl boats. new text end